Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1620.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the Philadelphia Housing Authority certain land and buildings situate in the City of Philadelphia, Philadelphia County, for $50,000.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 1.71 acres and improvements thereon, bounded and more particularly described as follows:ALL THOSE CERTAIN Lots or pieces of ground with the buildings 12345678910111213141516171819 and improvements thereon erected, situate in the Twenty-ninth Ward of the City of Philadelphia, and described as follows:One Thereof, Beginning at the point of intersection of the Southerly side of South College Avenue and the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence extending Eastwardly along the said Southerly side of South College Avenue, Seven hundred seventeen feet ten and three-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Westerly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Southwardly along said Westerly side of Twenty-second Street, Two hundred twenty-one feet five inches more or less, to a point on the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence extending along said Northerly side of Poplar Street Westwardly Six hundred eighty-one feet seven inches more or less, to the Southerly side of South College Avenue, and place of beginning.Another Thereof, Beginning at a point of intersection of the Southerly side of South College Avenue and the Easterly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Eastwardly along the Southerly side of said South College Avenue Five hundred sixty-four feet four and five-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Southerly side of Girard Avenue; thence extending Eastwardly along said Southerly side of Girard Avenue, One hundred sixty-nine feet four and seven-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Westerly side of Corinthian Avenue; thence extending Southwardly along said Westerly side of Corinthian Avenue, Four hundred fourteen feet five-eighths of an inch more or less to a point on the Northerly side of Poplar Street; thence Westwardly along the Northerly side of Poplar Street, Seven hundred fifteen feet four and seven-eighths inches more or less, to a point on the Easterly side of Twenty-second Street; thence extending Northwardly along said Easterly side of 20250HB1620PN1954 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Twenty-second Street, Two hundred forty feet ten and seven-eighths inches, more or less, to South College Avenue and place of beginning.BEING known as 2100 West Girard Avenue.Being inter alia the same premises which The Lankenau Hospital, a Corporation of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania by Deed dated 7/9/1952 and recorded 7/11/1952 in Philadelphia County in Deed Book MLS 152 Page 372 conveyed unto The General State Authority, a Public Corporation and Governmental Instrumentality of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, its Successors and Assigns, in fee.KNOWN AS the former Philadelphia Nursing Home, 2100 W. Girard Avenue, Philadelphia, PA 19130, TAX ID # 881444600CONTAINING 1.71-acres, more or less.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes, and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be 20250HB1620PN1954 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed under this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Use restriction.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition that the Philadelphia Housing Authority, its successors and assigns, shall develop the property solely as a senior living facility and a mixed-income affordable housing project, which may include a mixed-use component to support the underlying affordable housing development, such development to be completed, as evidenced by issuance of a certificate of occupancy for each component of the development, within five years after the date of conveyance. If the development cannot be completed within such period with the exercise of due diligence, the Department of General Services may authorize a longer period for completion, not to exceed 10 years. Should the Philadelphia Housing Authority, or its successors or assigns, develop the property for any other purpose, or not complete the development within the time provided, the property shall, at the Department of General Service's election, revert and revest in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania. This provision is intended to create a fee simple subject to a condition subsequent. This condition shall terminate upon the first to occur of the following:(1) on the date of completion of the development as evidenced by issuance of certificates of occupancy for each component of the project;(2) the reversion of the property to the Commonwealth of 20250HB1620PN1954 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania; or(3) the waiver by the Department of General Services of the reversion.(f) Conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(g) Sublease termination.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be conditioned upon the termination of the existing sublease (LML 1976-1) between the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the City of Philadelphia effective as of the date of the conveyance.(h) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(i) Deed.--The conveyance authorized under this section shall be made by a special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(j) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(k) Alternative disposition.--If the conveyance authorized under this section is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that no property 20250HB1620PN1954 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disposition plan shall be required.(l) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1620PN1954 - 6 - 12345